DI-23

DIAGNOSTICS - ENGINE

CIRCUIT INSPECTION

DI31C-03

DTC PO 105/31| Vacuum Sensor Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

Byabuilt —insensorunit, the vacuum sensor detectstheintake
V4 manifold pressure as a voltage. The engine ECU then deter-
mines the basic injection duration and basic ignition advance
(3.96)+ _ S — angle based on this voltage.
% S'Gfﬁ_— i Since the vacuum sensor does not use the atmospheric pres-
§ oal sure as a criterion, but senses the absolute pressure inside the
5 T } intake manifold (the pressure in proportion to the preset abso-
% 1.24+— | { lute vacuum 0), it is not influenced by fluctuations in the atmo-
o ! | mmHg | SPheric pressure due to high altitude and other factors. This
150 450 750(840) permits itto controlthe air fuel ratio at the properlevel underall
: - —— kPa | conditions.
20 60 100 (112)
Manifold Absolute Pressure
A01512
DTC No. DTC Detection condition Trouble Area
* Open orshortin vacuum sensor circuit
P0105/31 Open or shortinvacuum sensor circuitfor 0.5 sec. or more *Vacuum sensor
*EngineECU

If the engine ECU detects diagnostic trouble code "P0105/31”, it operates the fail safe function, keeping the

ignition timing and fuel injection volume constant and making it possible to drive the vehicle.

HINT:

Afterconfirming DTC”P0105/31”usethehand  —heldtesterto confirmthe manifold absolute pressure from

"CURRENT DATA”.

Manifold Absolute Pressure (kPa)

Malfunction

Approx. 0 * PIMcircuitshort
«\/Ccircuitopen or short
130 or more * PIMcircuitopen

e E2circuitopen
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WIRING DIAGRAM

Engine ECU
Vacuum Sensor - ~

1 5V
VC

2 P-L 2 |pim

BR-W E2

A06307

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

HINT:

. Read freeze frame data using hand-held tester. Because freeze frame records the engine conditions
when the malfunction is detected, when troubleshooting it is useful for determining whether the vehicle
was running or stopped, the engine warmed up or not, the air-fuel ratio lean or rich, etc. at the time
of the malfunction.

. If DTC ”"P0105/31” (Vacuum Sensor Circuit Malfunction), "P0110/24” (Intake Air Temp. Circuit Malfunc-
tion), ’P0115/22” (Water Temp. Circuit Malfunction), ’P0120/41” (Throttle Position Sensor Circuit Mal-
function) are output simultaneously, E2 (Sensor Ground) may be open.

When using hand-held tester

1 Connect the hand-held tester, and read value of manifold absolute pressure.

PREPARATION:
(@) Connect the hand-held tester to the DLC3.
(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON and hand-held tester main switch ON.
CHECK:
Read value of manifold absolute pressure on the hand-held tester.
OK:
Same as atmospheric pressure.

e |

1FZ-FE ENGINE SUP (RM619E)

OK Check for intermittent problems
(See page DI-4).
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2 | Check voltage between terminals VC and E2 of engine ECU connector.

ON PREPARATION:
(/ (@) Remove the glove compartment door.
— , , (b)  Turn the ignition switch ON.
o | .
HHR | | CHECK: . |
4 Measure voltage between terminals VC and E2 of engine ECU
connector.
E2 v VC OK:
(=) (+) Voltage: 4.5 - 5.5V
BE6653
P23721 A00389
NG Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN-19).

@

3 | Check voltage between terminals PIM and E2 of engine ECU connector.

PREPARATION:
C/ (@ Remove the glove compartment door.
(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Measure voltage between terminals PIM and E2 of engine ECU
connector.
OK:
Voltage: 3.3 -39V

U A RRAN
80 gnnf

=

BE6653

P23722 A00390
0K> Check and replace engine ECU

(See page IN-19).
NG \

4 | Check for open and short in harness and connector between vacuum sensor
and engine ECU.

@

Replace vacuum sensor.

NG> Repair and replace harness or connector.
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When not using hand-held tester

1 Check voltage between terminals VC and E2 of engine ECU connector.

ON PREPARATION:
(/ (@) Remove the glove compartment door.
— , , (b)  Turn the ignition switch ON.
o | .
HEHHRF | | CHECK: _ |
4 Measure voltage between terminals VC and E2 of engine ECU
connector.
E2 v VC OK:
(=) (+) Voltage: 4.5 - 5.5V
BE6653
P23721 A00389
NG Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN-19).

@

2 | Check voltage between terminals PIM and E2 of engine ECU connector.

PREPARATION:
C/ (@) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Measure voltage between terminals PIM and E2 of engine ECU
connector.
OK:
Voltage: 3.3 -39V

U A RRAN
00 BNINP

BE6653

P23722 A00390
0K> Check and replace engine ECU

(See page IN-19).
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and engine ECU.

3 | Check for open and short in harness and connector between vacuum sensor

OK
~_—

NG

Repair and replace harness or connector.

Replace vacuum sensor.
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